District of Columbia statutes.
46-352.03

Initiating and responding tribunal of state.

Under this chapter, a tribunal of the District may serve as an initiating tribunal to forward proceedings to a tribunal of another state, and as a responding tribunal for proceedings initiated in another state or a foreign country.

History

Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 203, 63 DCR 222